Maryland, session 2026, HB1552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
2–220.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS L BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(B) A LOCAL LICENSING BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE TO THE HOLDER
OF A MANUFACTURER’S LICENSE.
(C) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER, FOR ON–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION, TO:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1552*

HOUSE BILL 1552
(1) SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR PRODUCED BY THE HOLDER OR
ANOTHER HOLDER OF A MANUFACTURER’S LICENSE; AND
(2) PROVIDE A SAMPLE OF THE BEER, WINE, OR LIQUOR THAT IS
AUTHORIZED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AT NO COST.
(D) THE HOURS OF SALE FOR A CLASS L BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
ARE THE SAME AS THOSE FOR THE UNDERLYING MANUFACTURER’S LICENSE.
(E) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE IS $250.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.